Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.120

Agricultural college grant to Washington State University.

The ninety thousand acres of land granted by the United States government to the state for an agricultural college in section 16 of the enabling act are assigned to the support of Washington State University.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.79.120.]